Illinois, session 104th, SB1118.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interstate Rail Compact Act is amended by 5changing Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (45 ILCS 70/0.01)  (from Ch. 114, par. 600)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Interstate Rail Compact Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)